District of Columbia statutes.
23-1309

References to “Bail Agency” deemed to be to “Pretrial Services Agency.”

Any reference in any law, rule, regulation, document, or record of the United States or the District of Columbia to the District of Columbia Bail Agency shall be deemed to be a reference to the District of Columbia Pretrial Services Agency.

History

Sept. 27, 1978, 92 Stat. 753, Pub. L. 95-388, § 3

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 23-1309.
1973 Ed., § 23-1309.